Utah statutes.
19-6-1205.   Local government arrangement.

If a local government enters into an arrangement with a manufacturer to facilitate consumer electronics recycling in accordance with this part, the local government may enter into the arrangement without requiring a request for proposal or similar competitive procurement process required by law.

